New Jersey, session 222, A2736.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.2003, c.206 (C.2C:14-9) is amended as follows: 1.  a.  An actor commits a crime of the fourth degree if, knowing that he is not licensed or privileged to do so, and under circumstances in which a reasonable person would know that another may expose intimate parts or may engage in sexual penetration or sexual contact, he observes another person without that persons consent and under circumstances in which a reasonable person would not expect to be observed. b.  (1)  An actor commits a crime of the third degree if, knowing that he is not licensed or privileged to do so, he photographs, films, videotapes, records, or otherwise reproduces in any manner, the actual or deepfake image of another person whose intimate parts are exposed,  or who is engaged in an act of sexual penetration or sexual contact, without that persons consent and under circumstances in which a reasonable person would not expect to be observed. (2)   An actor commits a crime of the fourth degree if, knowing that he is not licensed or privileged to do so, he photographs, films, videotapes, records, or otherwise reproduces in any manner, the image of the undergarment-clad intimate parts of another person, without that persons consent and under circumstances in which a reasonable person would not expect to have his undergarment-clad intimate parts observed. For purposes of this subsection, a deepfake is an image, a video, or an audio recording of speech or conduct that appears to a reasonable person to realistically depict the speech or conduct of a person, who did not in fact engage in the speech or conduct, that has been created using advanced computer technology in a way that makes the image, video, or audio recording look authentic. c.     An actor commits a crime of the third degree if, knowing that he is not licensed or privileged to do so, he discloses any photograph, film, videotape, recording or any other reproduction of the image, taken in violation of subsection b. of this section, of: (1) another person who is engaged in an act of sexual penetration or sexual contact; (2) another person whose intimate parts are exposed; or (3) another persons undergarment-clad intimate parts, unless that person has consented to such disclosure. An actor commits a crime of the fourth degree if, knowing that he is not licensed or privileged to do so, or with reckless disregard of any license or privilege to do so, he discloses any deepfake image based upon another persons image created in violation of subsection b. of this section. For purposes of this subsection: (1) disclose means sell, manufacture, give, provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver, transfer, publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, advertise, offer, share, or make available via the Internet or by any other means, whether for pecuniary gain or not; and (2) intimate parts has the meaning ascribed to it in N.J.S.2C:14-1.  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:43-3, a fine not to exceed $30,000 may be imposed for a violation of this subsection. d.    It is an affirmative defense to a crime under this section that: (1)   the actor posted or otherwise provided prior notice to the person of the actors intent to engage in the conduct specified in subsection a., b., or c., and (2)   the actor acted with a lawful purpose. e.  (1)  It shall not be a violation of subsection a. or b. to observe another person in the access way, foyer or entrance to a fitting room or dressing room operated by a retail establishment or to photograph, film, videotape, record or otherwise reproduce the image of such person, if the actor conspicuously posts at the entrance to the fitting room or dressing room prior notice of his intent to make the observations, photographs, films, videotapes, recordings or other reproductions. (2)   It shall be a violation of subsection c. to disclose in any manner any such photograph, film, videotape or recording of another person using a fitting room or dressing room except under the following circumstances: (a)   to law enforcement officers in connection with a criminal prosecution; (b)   pursuant to subpoena or court order for use in a legal proceeding; or (c)   to a co-worker, manager or supervisor acting within the scope of his employment. f.     It shall be a violation of subsection a. or b. to observe another person in a private dressing stall of a fitting room or dressing room operated by a retail establishment or to photograph, film, videotape, record or otherwise reproduce the image of another person in a private dressing stall of a fitting room or dressing room. g.    For purposes of this act, a law enforcement officer, or a corrections officer or guard in a correctional facility or jail, who is engaged in the official performance of his duties shall be deemed to be licensed or privileged to make and to disclose observations, photographs, films, videotapes, recordings or any other reproductions. h.    Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:1-8 or any other provisions of law, a conviction arising under subsection b. of this section shall not merge with a conviction under subsection c. of this section, nor shall a conviction under subsection c. merge with a conviction under subsection b. (cf. P.L.2016, c.2, s.1) 2.  N.J.S.2C:13-5 is amended as follows: 2C:13-5.  Criminal Coercion.       A.        Offense defined.  A person is guilty of criminal coercion if, with purpose unlawfully to restrict anothers freedom of action to engage or refrain from engaging in conduct, he threatens to: (1)   Inflict bodily injury on anyone or commit any other offense, regardless of the immediacy of the threat; (2)   Accuse anyone of an offense; (3)   Expose any secret which would tend to subject any person to hatred, contempt or ridicule, or to impair his credit or business repute; (4)   Take or withhold action as an official, or cause an official to take or withhold action; (5)   Bring about or continue a strike, boycott or other collective action, except that such a threat shall not be deemed coercive when the restriction compelled is demanded in the course of negotiation for the benefit of the group in whose interest the actor acts; (6)   Testify or provide information or withhold testimony or information with respect to anothers legal claim or defense; or (7)   Perform any other act which would not in itself substantially benefit the actor but which is calculated to substantially harm another person with respect to his health, safety, business, calling, career, financial condition, reputation or personal relationships, including any threat to disclose an actual or deepfake image based upon another persons image, created in violation of P.L.2003, c.206 (C.2C:14-9). For purposes of this subsection, a deepfake is an image, a video, or an audio recording of speech or conduct that appears to a reasonable person to realistically depict the speech or conduct of a person, who did not in fact engage in the speech or conduct, that has been created using advanced computer technology in a way that makes the image, video, or audio recording look authentic. It is an affirmative defense to prosecution based on paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (6) and (7) that the actor believed the accusation or secret to be true or the proposed official action justified and that his purpose was limited to compelling the other to behave in a way reasonably related to the circumstances which were the subject of the accusation, exposure or proposed official action, as by desisting from further misbehavior, making good a wrong done, or refraining from taking any action or responsibility for which the actor believes the other disqualified. b.    Grading. Criminal coercion is a crime of the fourth degree unless the threat is to commit a crime more serious than one of the fourth degree or the actors purpose is criminal, in which cases the offense is a crime of the third degree.(cf. P.L.2015, c.98, s.3) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.